New York, session 2025-2026, A1141.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new article 2 8-A to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 8-A 4 HEALTH CARE 5 INFORMATION MANAGEMENT ACT 6 Section 820. Short title. 7 821. Compilation of data. 8 822. Presentation of data. 9 823. Annual report. 10 § 820. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the 11 "health care information management act". 12 § 821. Compilation of data. The commissioner shall establish rules and 13 regulations requiring every public and private hospital, as defined in 14 subdivision one of section twenty-eight hundred one of this chapter, in 15 conjunction with emergency and other medical services, to compile the 16 following and submit such data in a form useable for such purposes and 17 tallied by census tract, annually to the department: 18 1. With regard to emergency medical services: (a) The length of time 19 between each individual's call to 911 and such individual's arrival at 20 the emergency room; 21 (b) The length of time between, but not limited to arrival and admis- 22 sion at such hospital regardless of method of arrival, which may include 23 but not be limited to walk-ins and arrival via ambulance; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02825-01-5 A. 1141 2 1 (c) The number of patients treated and released without admission to 2 such hospital; 3 (d) The total amount of time between an individual's admission to the 4 emergency room and obtaining a bed on the hospital floor; 5 2. With regard to other medical services: (a) The total wait time for 6 all patients to receive a bed and/or stretcher after arrival at such 7 hospital; 8 (b) The total wait time for all pregnant people, pre and post-partum, 9 to receive a bed and/or stretcher after arrival at such hospital; 10 (c) The percentage of people admitted, in labor with no pre-partum 11 care; 12 (d) The number of births; 13 (e) The number of fatalities due to asthma; 14 (f) The number of fatalities as a result of pulmonary diseases; 15 (g) The number of patients with any form of cardiac disease; and 16 (h) Any additional data the commissioner deems pertinent to such 17 compilation of data. 18 § 822. Presentation of data. Data from all individual patients 19 compiled under section eight hundred twenty-one of this article shall be 20 placed into one of the following categories based on each individual's 21 current insurance status: 22 1. Uninsured; 23 2. Medicare recipient: 24 (a) Part A; 25 (b) Part B; 26 (c) Part C; or 27 (d) Part D; 28 3. Medicaid recipient; 29 4. Insured with an employer-driven insurance plan; or 30 5. Insured with a metal level of: 31 (a) Bronze; 32 (b) Silver; 33 (c) Gold; or 34 (d) Platinum. 35 § 823. Annual report. On or before the first of January, beginning in 36 two thousand twenty-seven and every year thereafter, the commissioner 37 shall submit to the governor, the temporary president of the senate and 38 the speaker of the assembly, a report of the compiled data outlined in 39 section eight hundred twenty-one of this article. 40 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 41 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 42 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 43 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or 44 before such effective date.